en: pak choi, bok choy, pok choi
ar: ملفوف صيني
bo: ཚལ་དཀར་ཆེ་བ།
ca: pak choi, bleda xinesa
cs: bok čoj, pak čoj zelí, čínské
da: bok choi, pak choi, kinesisk kål
de: Pak Choi, Chinesischer Senfkohl
el: mποκ τσόι
es: bok choy, pak choi
eu: txinatar aza
fa: کلم چینی
fi: pinaattikiinankaali, pak choi, bok choy, paksoi, pak-soi
fr: bok choy, pak choï
hr: pak choi
hu: bordáskel, bok choy, pak choi, bok choi
id: pakcoy, bok choy
is: blaðkál, salatkál, kínverskt selleríkál
it: bok choy, pak-choi
ja: チンゲンサイ, チンゲン菜, 青梗菜
kn: ಬಾಯ್ ಚಾಯ್
ko: 청경채
la: Brassica rapa subsp. chinensis
mk: бок чој, пак чој
ms: bok choy, pak choi, pok choi
nb: bak choy, pak choy, paksoi, tai tsai
nl: paksoi, bokchoy, pak-choi
pl: pak choi, bok choy, pok choi, kapusta bok choy, kapusta pak choy
pt: pak-choi, bok-choi, tsoi sum
ru: бок-чой, пак-чо́й, кита́йская черешко́вая капу́ста
sv: sellerikål, pak choi
uk: бок-чой
vi: cải thìa, cải bẹ trắng, cải chíp, bạch giới tử
zh: 小白菜

en: brussels sprouts
af: brusselspruit
ar: كرنب بروكسل
bg: брюкселско зеле
bn: ব্রাসেলস স্প্রাউট
br: kaol-bihan
ca: col de Brusselles
cs: růžičková kapusta, kapusta růžičková
cy: ysgewyll
da: rosenkål
de: Rosenkohl
el: λαχανάκι Βρυξελλών, λάχανα Βρυξελλών
eo: burĝonbrasiko
es: col de Bruselas, coles de bruselas
et: rooskapsas, brüsseli kapsas
eu: bruselaza
fa: کلم بروکسل
fi: ruusukaali, brysselinkaali
fr: chou de Bruxelles, choux de bruxelles
ga: bachlóg Bhruiséile
gd: buinneag Bhruisealach
gl: col de Bruxelas
gv: caaylag
he: כרוב ניצנים
hr: kelj pupčar
hu: bimbós kel
id: kubis brussel
is: rósakál
it: cavolini di Bruxelles, cavolo di Bruxelles
ja: メキャベツ, 芽キャベツ
ka: ბრიუსელის კომბოსტო
kk: Брюссель қырыққабаты
ko: 방울다다기
la: Cauliculus Bruxellanus
lb: brockelchen
lt: briuselio kopūstas
lv: briseles kāposti, rožkāposti
ms: kubis brussels
mt: kaboċċi ta' Brussell, kaboċċi taz-zokk
nb: rosenkål
nl: spruitjes, spruitkool
nn: rosenkål
nv: atʼééké bijish yázhí
pl: kapusta brukselska, Kapusta warzywna brukselska, brukselka, brukselki
pt: couve-de-bruxelas
ro: varză de Bruxelles
ru: брюссельская капуста
sh: prokelj
sk: kapusta obyčajná ružičková, kel ružičkový
sl: brstični ohrovt
sr: прокељ
sv: brysselkål
ta: கிளைக்கோசு
tg: ғужмкарам
th: กะหล่ำดาว
tl: usbong ng bruselas
tr: brüksel lahanası
uk: брюссельська капуста
uz: bryussel karami
vi: cải brussels
zh: 抱子甘藍

en: kohlrabi
de: kohlrabi
es: colirrábano
fr: chou-rave
hr: korabica
it: cavolo rapa
nl: koolrabi
pl: kalarepa
ru: Кольра́би
ua: Кольрабі

en: rapini, broccoli rabe
de: Wildbrokkoli
es: grelos, rapini
fr: rapini, brocoli-rave
hr: rapini
it: friarielli, broccoletti, broccoli di rapa, cime di rapa, rapini, pulezze

en: kale, curly cale, curly kale
af: boerkool
ar: كرنب أجعد
bn: পাতাকপি
ca: col verda
cs: kapusta kadeřavá
da: grønkål
de: Grünkohl
el: λαχανίδα
eo: krispa brasiko
es: col rizada
et: lehtkapsas
eu: aza berde
fa: کلم کالی
fi: lehtikaali
fr: chou frisé
ga: càl
gv: caayl jiarg
he: כרוב על
hi: एक प्रकार का गोभी
hr: kelj
hu: fodros kel
id: kubis keriting
is: grænkál
it: cavolo riccio
ja: ケール
jv: kalé
ka: კალე
kk: кале, kale, كالە
kn: ಕೇಲ್
ko: 케일
ky: бакча капустасы
la: brassica oleracea convar. acephala var. sabellica
li: boerekuuel
lt: lapiniai kopūstai
lv: lapu kāposti
mk: кељ
ml: കലെ
ms: kale
nb: grønnkål
nl: boerenkool
nn: grønkål
or: ଗୋଟେ ପ୍ରକାରର କୋବି
pa: ਕਾਲੀ
pl: jarmuż, jarmużu
pt: couve, couve-de-folhas
ru: кале
sh: kelj
sk: kel
sl: kodrasti ohrovt
sq: lakër jeshile
sv: grönkål
sw: sukumawiki
ta: பரட்டைக்கீரை
tr: kara lahana
uk: браунколь
vi: cải xoăn
zh: 羽衣甘藍

en: kale sprouts
it: germogli di cavolo nero
pl: kiełki jarmużu

en: komatsuna
it: komatsuna
ja: 小松菜, コマツナ

en: baby kale
de: Kohlsprossen
fr: Jeunes pousses de chou frisé
hr: mladi kelj

en: kale juice
de: Grünkohlsaft
es: jugo de col rizada
fr: jus de chou frisé
hr: sok od kelja
it: succo di cavolo
nl: boerenkoolsap

en: kale puree
de: Grünkohlpüree
fr: purée de chou frisé
hr: pire od kelja
it: purea di cavolo
pl: przecier z liści jarmużu

en: savoy cabbage, green cabbage
ca: col de milà
cs: hlávková kapusta
da: savojkål
de: Wirsing, Wirsingkohl
el: λάχανο μιλάνου, κράμβη του μιλάνου, λάχανο σαβοΐας
eo: savoja brasiko
es: col de saboya, col de Milán
eu: aza kizkur
fa: کلم ساوی
fi: kurttukaali
fr: chou vert, choux verts, chou de milan, chou de savoie
ga: cabáiste saváí
gv: cabbash chraplit
hu: kelkáposzta
id: kubis savoy
is: blöðrukál
it: verza, verze, cavolo verza, cavolo di milano
ja: サボイキャベツ
ko: 사보이양배추
la: brassica oleracea sabauda
lt: savojinis kopūstas
lv: savojas kāposti, virziņkāposti
nl: savooikool, groene kool
nn: savoykål
pl: kapusta warzywna włoska
pt: couve-lombarda
ro: varza creață
ru: савойская капуста
sk: kapusta obyčajná kelová, kel hlávkový
sr: кељ
tr: milano lahanası
uk: капуста савойська
wa: savoye
zh: 野甘蓝

en: gai lan, chinese broccoli, chinese kale, gai-lan, kailan, kai-lan
ca: bròquil xinès
de: kai-lan
eo: ĉina brokolo
es: brassica oleracea var. alboglabra
eu: kai-lan
fa: کلم‌برگ چینی
fi: härmekaali, kiinanbrokkoli, kailaan
fr: brocoli chinois
he: ברוקולי סיני
hr: gai lan
id: kailan
it: brassica oleracea var. alboglabra
ja: カイラン
ko: 가이란
ms: kailan
nl: kailan
sv: daggkål, kinesisk broccoli
th: คะน้า
za: byaekgaiqlanz
zh: 芥藍

en: sauerkraut
af: Suurkool
ar: ساوركراوت
az: Kələm turşusu
be: Капуста квашаная
bg: Кисело зеле
br: Kaol-go
ca: xucrut
cs: kysané zelí
da: sauerkraut
de: Sauerkraut
el: Ξινό λάχανο
eo: Acida brasiko
es: Chucrut
et: hapukapsas
eu: Sauerkraut
fa: کلم‌ترش
fi: hapankaali
fo: súrkál
fr: choucroute
ga: Cabáiste géaraithe
he: כרוב כבוש
hr: kiseli kupus
hu: Savanyú káposzta
id: Sauerkraut
io: Surkruto
is: súrkál
it: crauti
ja: ザワークラウト
ka: მჟავე კომბოსტო
ko: 자우어크라우트
lb: Sauermous
li: zoermoos
lv: skābēti kāposti
mk: кисела зелја
nb: sauerkraut
nl: zuurkool
nn: surkål
pa: ਜ਼ਾਉਰਕਰੌਟ
pl: Kapusta kwaszona, kapusta kiszona, kapusty kiszonej, kiszonej kapusty, kiszona kapusta, kwaszonej kapusty
pt: chucrute
ro: varză acră
ru: квашеная капуста
sh: Kiseli kupus
sk: kyslá kapusta
sq: Lakër turshi
sr: кисели купус
sv: surkål
th: เซาเออร์เคราท์
uk: Квашена капуста
vi: Dưa cải Đức
vo: züdöfabrasid
yi: זויערקרויט
zh: 德国酸菜

en: raw sauerkraut
de: Rohes Sauerkraut
fr: choucroute crue
hr: sirovi kiseli kupus
it: crauti crudi

en: sauerkraut juice
de: Sauerkrautsaft
es: zumo de choucroute, jugo de choucroute
fi: hapankaalimehu
fr: jus de choucroute
hr: sok od kiselog kupusa
it: succo di crauti
nl: zuurkoolsap
pl: sok z kapusty kiszonej, sok z kiszonej kapusty, sok z kwaszonej kapusty

en: kimchi
xx: kimchi
az: Kimçi
ko: 김치
pl: kimchi
ru: Кимчхи
ua: Кімчі

en: stalk vegetable
fr: légume-tige, légumes-tiges
it: gambo vegetale
lv: kātiņa dārzenis
nl: stengelgroente

en: celery
af: Seldery
am: ሰለሪ
ar: كرفس
az: İyli kərəviz
bg: целина
bn: পাথুনি শাক
bo: ལྕ་ཚལ།
br: Ach
bs: Celer
ca: Api
cs: Miřík celer, celer
cy: Seleri
da: selleri
de: Sellerie, Staudensellerie
el: Σέλινο
eo: celerio
es: apio
et: Aedseller, seller
eu: Apio
fa: کرفس
fi: Selleri
fr: céleri
ga: Soilire
gl: Apio
gv: Smullish
he: סלרי
hr: celer, celera, stablo celera
ht: Sèlri
hu: Zeller
id: Seledri
io: Celerio
is: Seljurót
it: sedano
ja: セロリ
jv: Slèdri
ka: ნიახური
kk: Балдыркөк
kn: ಸೆಲರಿ
ko: 셀러리
la: Apium graveolens
lt: valgomasis salieras, salierai
lv: selerija, selerijas, seleriju
mr: अजमोदा
ms: Daun Saderi
mt: karfus
my: တရုတ်နံနံပင်
nb: Selleri
nl: selderij
nv: Hazaʼaleehtsoh
oc: Api
os: Маламар
pl: Seler zwyczajny, seler, selera, selerowy, selerowe, selerowa, selerem
pt: aipo, aipos
qu: Apiyu
ro: Țelină
ru: Сельдерей пахучий, сельдерей, сельдерея
sa: कुस्तुम्बरीपर्णम्
sc: Appiu
sh: Celer
sk: Zeler voňavý, zeler
sl: Navadna zelena, listna zelena
sq: Selinoja
sr: Целер, celer
su: Salédri
sv: Selleri
ta: சிவரிக்கீரை
tg: Карафс
th: ขึ้นฉ่าย
tl: Apyo
tr: Kereviz
uk: селера, селе́ра
vi: Cần tây
wa: Celeri
yi: סעלערי
za: Ginzcaiq
zh: 旱芹

en: celery stalk
de: Stangensellerie
fr: céleri branche, branche de céleri, branches de céleri
hr: stabljika celera
it: gambo di sedano
nl: bleekselderij
pl: seler naciowy, selera naciowego

en: celery leaves
de: Sellerieblätter, Sellerieblatt
es: apio hoja
fr: feuilles de céleri
hr: lišće celera
it: foglie di sedano
nl: selderblad, bladselderij
pl: liść selera, liście selera, seler liść